Utah statutes.
53-7-406.   Penalties.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a manufacturer, wholesale
dealer, agent, or any other person or entity who knowingly sells or offers to
sell cigarettes, other than through retail sale, in violation of Section
53-7-403:
(i)  for a first offense shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed
$10,000 per each sale of cigarettes; and
(ii)  for a subsequent offense shall be liable for a civil penalty not to
exceed $25,000 per each sale of such cigarettes.
(b)  A penalty imposed under Subsection (1)(a) may not exceed $100,000 during
any 30-day period against any one entity described in Subsection (1).
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a retail dealer who
knowingly sells cigarettes in violation of Section 53-7-403 shall:
(i)  for a first offense for each sale or offer for sale of cigarettes, if the
total number of cigarettes sold or offered for sale:
(A)  does not exceed 1,000 cigarettes, be liable for a civil penalty not to
exceed $500 for each sale or offer of sale; and
(B)  does exceed 1,000 cigarettes, be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed
$1,000 for each sale or offer of sale; and
(ii)  for a subsequent offense, if the total number of cigarettes sold or
offered for sale:
(A)  does not exceed 1,000 cigarettes, be liable for a civil penalty not to
exceed $2,000 for each sale or offer of sale; and
(B)  does exceed 1,000 cigarettes, be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed
$5,000 for each sale or offer of sale.
(b)  A penalty imposed under Subsection (2)(a) against any retail dealer shall
not exceed $25,000 during a 30-day period.
(3)  In addition to any penalty prescribed by law, any corporation,
partnership, sole proprietor, limited partnership, or association engaged in
the manufacture of cigarettes that knowingly makes a false certification
pursuant to Section 53-7-404 shall, for each false certification:
(a)  for a first offense, be liable for a civil penalty of at least $75,000;
and
(b)  for a subsequent offense, be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed
$250,000.
(4)  Any person violating any other provision in this part shall be liable for
a civil penalty for each violation:
(a)  for a first offense, not to exceed $1,000; and
(b)  for a subsequent offense, not to exceed $5,000.
(5)  Any cigarettes that have been sold or offered for sale that do not comply
with the performance standard required by Section 53-7-403 shall be subject to
forfeiture under Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act,
and, upon being forfeited, shall be destroyed, provided, however, that prior
to the destruction of any cigarette seized pursuant to this part, the true
holder of the trademark rights in the cigarette brand shall be permitted to
inspect the cigarette.
(6)  In addition to any other remedy provided by law, the state fire marshal
or attorney general may file an action in district court for a violation of
this part, including petitioning for injunctive relief or to recover any costs
or damages suffered by the state because of a violation of this part,
including enforcement costs relating to the specific violation and attorney
fees.  Each violation of this part or of rules or regulations adopted under
this part constitutes a separate civil violation for which the state fire
marshal or attorney general may obtain relief.
